src/morphology/incoming/verb_outer_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.%0i@ @U.TAMA.%0s@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.ii@ @U.TAMA.is@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.isii@ @U.TAMA.isis@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.nii@ @U.TAMA.nis@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.sii@ @U.TAMA.sis@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.TAMA.yii-a@ @U.TAMA.yii@ @U.TAMA.yis-y@ @U.TAMA.yis@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@ @U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@ @U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ @U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@

LEXICON Root

@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@                   NoDistributive;
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                 SubjectOnly;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                   SubjectAndDirectObject;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                SubjectAndObliqueObject;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                 SubjectDirectObjectOrObliqueObject;
@U.VALENCE.EXPERIENCER@                  ObliqueObjectOnly;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@                 SubjectAndDirectObject;


LEXICON SubjectOnly

! In intransitive verbs, distributive forms are only found with plural and
! impersonal (4th person) subjects.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                                              Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@                                               Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@                         NoDistributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@                         NoDistributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                         NoDistributive;


LEXICON ObliqueObjectOnly

! In experiencer verbs, distributive forms are only found with plural and
! impersonal (4th person) indirect object marking.  (e.g., gimádàgúdìlo "they
! are all sick (each and every one of them", gwádàgúdìlo "people are all sick")
@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@                                              Distributive;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@                                               Distributive;
@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@                         NoDistributive;
@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@                         NoDistributive;
@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                         NoDistributive;


LEXICON SubjectAndDirectObject

! In transitive and 'transitional' transitive verbs, distributive forms can
! refer either to subjects (plural or impersonal/4th-person) or to direct
! objects.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                           Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                           Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                           Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                            Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                         NoDistributive;


LEXICON SubjectAndObliqueObject

! In verbs that take subject and oblique object marking (but no direct object
! marking), the distributive marker can refer either to subjects or oblique
! objects.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@                          Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@                          Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@                          Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@                           Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@                        NoDistributive;


!
! FIXME FROMHERE: make sure this only provides one pathway out per combination
! of subject, direct object, and oblique object conditions!
!
LEXICON SubjectDirectObjectOrObliqueObject

@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@     NoDistributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@       Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@       Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@       Distributive;

@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@       Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@       Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@       Distributive;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@       Distributive;

!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@        Distributive;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@        Distributive;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@        Distributive;
!@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@        Distributive;


LEXICON Distributive

! Distributive marking is optional on any forms where it could potentially
! appear.
@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@dà                                        #;
@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@                                                         #;

LEXICON NoDistributive
@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@                                                         #;
